New Jersey, session 222, A3206.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   A United States flag shall be displayed in the room in which a public body covered by the provisions of the Senator Byron M. Baer Open Public Meetings Act, P.L.1975, c.231 (C.10:4-6 et seq.), meets.  At the commencement of every meeting of a public body, the person presiding, or a person designated by the person presiding, shall lead those persons present in a recitation of the following pledge of allegiance to the flag:  I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and to the republic for which it stands, one nation, under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.